Maine, session 132, LD2096.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §84, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Prohibition. Except as provided under subsection 5, a licensee may not:
A. Operate an agricultural fair outside of the fair dates assigned by the commissioner
under this section; or
B. Advertise or market an agricultural fair as taking place outside of the fair dates
assigned by the commissioner under this section.
For purposes of this subsection, a licensee holding an event within one week of a fair's
assigned fair dates is considered to be operating a fair outside of the fair dates assigned by
the commissioner.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §84, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Exception. A licensee may host an exhibition up to 48 hours prior to the assigned
fair dates for the purposes of displaying and awarding premiums as provided under section
86, subsection 5.
Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §84, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. License suspension. The commissioner may suspend the license of a licensee that
violates this section.
Page 1 - 132LR2692(03)

Sec. 4. 7 MRSA §86, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2025, c. 161, §3, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
In determining distribution under this subsection, an allowance may not be made on
premiums offered and paid by a licensee at any competition or event held other than during
the period in which its annual fair is held and at any competition or event judged up to 48
hours prior to the licensed fair dates, except that an allowance may not be made on
premiums offered and paid by a licensee at any competition or event under paragraphs A,
F-1, I, J and K judged up to 48 hours prior to the licensed fair dates. Allowance may not
be made or consideration given for lump sums, payments or premiums previously arranged
and agreed upon for the presentation and display of any animals or products without regard
to competition or event. The department may provide an allowance to licensees for
payments made for educational agricultural talks, workshops and demonstrations pursuant
to paragraph K without regard to premiums paid for competitions or events in this category.
Sec. 5. 7 MRSA §86, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2025, c. 161, §3, is further
amended by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
Premiums and payments used to determine apportionment under this subsection are limited
to those paid for:
Sec. 6. Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry and State
Harness Racing Commission to review rules. The Commissioner of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, in consultation with the State Harness Racing Commission,
shall review rules adopted pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 7, section 82,
subsection 5 to determine if changes are necessary regarding standards for setting harness
racing dates and shall initiate rulemaking as necessary to ensure consistency with Title 7,
chapter 4. Upon completion of the review, the commissioner shall report to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over agricultural matters with the
commissioner's findings no later than January 15, 2027.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2692(03)